New York, session 2025-2026, A11543.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law, the asses- 2 sor of the city of Mount Vernon is hereby authorized to correct a 3 misclassification error on behalf of Tanya Hairston for the 2011 - 2020 4 city assessment rolls, for the parcel located at 40 North Tenth Avenue 5 in the city of Mount Vernon. Such property was improperly classified as 6 commercial property when such property is a residential two-family 7 dwelling. Once such reclassification is granted and the appropriate 8 corrections are made to the subject rolls, the applicable governing body 9 or tax departments, in their sole discretion, shall provide for the 10 refund of the taxes paid and cancel taxes remaining unpaid. 11 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD16028-01-6